Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,156
Suspension, revocation, denial, or administrative penalty; order; hearing.

Suspension or revocation of a certificate of authority, the denial of an application for a certificate, or the imposition of an administrative penalty shall be by written order and shall be sent by the Director of Insurance to the health maintenance organization or applicant by certified or registered mail and to the Department of Health and Human Services. The written order shall state the grounds, charges, or conduct on which the suspension, revocation, denial, or administrative penalty is based. The health maintenance organization or applicant may in writing request a hearing within thirty days from the date of mailing of the order. If no written request is made, such order shall be final upon the expiration of thirty days.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 65;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 253;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 192.